sl-SI: Podprti standardi SDI: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Drugo
ru: Поддерживаемые стандарты SDI: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Мб/с); Другой
tr: Desteklenen SDI standartları: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Diğer
da: Understøttede SDI-standarder: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Andet
es: Estándares SDI admitidos: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Otros
sk-SK: Podporované normy SDI: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Iné
pl: Obsługiwane standardy SDI: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Inne
fi: Tuetut SDI-standardit: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Muu
hr-HR: Podržani SDI standardi: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Ostalo
el: Υποστηριζόμενα πρότυπα SDI: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Άλλο
nl: Ondersteunde SDI-standaarden: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Andere
ja: サポートされるSDI規格: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); その他
bg-BG: Поддържани SDI стандарти: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Други
en: Supported SDI standards: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Other
vi: Tiêu chuẩn SDI được hỗ trợ: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Khác
ro-RO: Standarde SDI suportate: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Altele
sv: SDI-standarder som stöds: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Övrigt
pt-PT: Padrões SDI suportados: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Outro
pt-BR: Padrões SDI suportados: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Outro
fr: Normes SDI prises en charge: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Autre
nb: Støttede SDI-standarder: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Annet
zh-CN: 支持的 SDI 标准: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); 其他
hu: Támogatott SDI-szabványok: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Egyéb
it: Standard SDI supportati: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Altro
cs: Podporované SDI standardy: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Jiné
zh-TW: 支援的 SDI 標準: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI（1.5G）; SD-SDI（270 Mb/s）; 其他
ko: 지원 SDI 표준: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); 기타
de: Unterstützte SDI-Standards: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Sonstiges
lt-LT: Palaikomi SDI standartai: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1,5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); Kita
th: มาตรฐาน SDI ที่รองรับ: 12G-SDI; 3G-SDI; 6G-SDI; DVB-ASI; HD-SDI (1.5G); SD-SDI (270 Mb/s); อื่นๆ